Nebraska, session 109, LB593.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 66-1226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
66-1226 (1) The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the ASTM
International American Society For Testing and Materials publication D4814-24b
D4814-89 entitled Standard Specification Specifications for Automotive Spark-
Ignition Spark Ignition Engine Fuel Fuels. The Department of Agriculture shall
file copies of such publication with the Secretary of State and Clerk of the
Legislature.
(2) Commencing on the effective date of this act January 1, 1992, all
automotive spark-ignition spark ignition engine fuel fuels sold in Nebraska
shall meet the specification as found in the ASTM International American
Society For Testing and Materials publication D4814-24b D4814-89 entitled
Standard Specification Specifications for Automotive Spark-Ignition Spark
Ignition Engine Fuel Fuels. Any person who violates this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first such violation and a Class IV
felony for all subsequent violations.
(3) For purposes of this section, automotive spark-ignition spark ignition
engine fuel fuels shall mean gasoline and its blends with oxygenates such as
alcohol and ethers.
Sec. 2. Original section 66-1226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-